Rhode Island statutes. Title 22 General Assembly
Chapter 12 Fiscal Notes

22-12-1.
When fiscal notes required.

All bills and resolutions having an effect on the revenues, expenditures, or fiscal liability of the state, which can be calculated with reasonable accuracy, excepting appropriation measures carrying specific dollar amounts, shall be accompanied by a brief explanatory statement or note which sets forth their estimated dollar effect. The statements or notes shall be known as “fiscal notes,” and they shall accompany each such bill or resolution prior to consideration of the house in which the bill or resolution originated. Fiscal notes shall also accompany each bill or resolution that affects any city or town financially.

History of Section.

P.L. 1965, ch. 204, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 248, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 126, art. 47, § 1.

22-12-1.1.
Fiscal notes for administrative rules.

Whenever a state department or agency proposes to adopt administrative rules in accordance with the provisions of chapter 35 of title 42, which rules affect the state or any city or town financially, the proposed rules shall be accompanied by a fiscal note. The budget officer shall be responsible, in cooperation with these agencies, for the preparation of the fiscal note, except that the department of revenue, in consultation and cooperation with the Rhode Island League of Cities and Towns, shall be responsible for the preparation of the fiscal note for bills affecting cities and towns. Fiscal notes shall be returned to the state department or agency proposing to adopt administrative rules within ten (10) calendar days of when the request was made. Copies of all fiscal notes for administrative rules shall be forwarded to the chairperson of the house finance committee, the chairperson of the senate finance committee, house fiscal advisor and senate fiscal advisor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 213, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 246, art. 39, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 98, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 145, § 1.

22-12-2.
Content of fiscal notes.

Fiscal notes shall, wherever possible, cite effect in dollar amounts for the current fiscal year and estimates for the next two (2) succeeding fiscal years. No comment or opinion relative to the merits of the bill shall be included, excepting however that technical or mechanical defects may be noted. Fiscal notes for bills affecting cities and towns shall cite the effect by city and town.

History of Section.

P.L. 1965, ch. 204, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 248, § 1.

22-12-3.
Request for fiscal notes.

Fiscal notes shall only be requested by the chairperson of the house or senate finance committee upon being notified by another committee chairperson, the sponsor of the bill or resolution, or in the case of bills or resolutions affecting cities or towns, by the Rhode Island League of Cities and Towns in addition to the individuals referred to in this section, of the existence of any bill or resolution described in §

22-12-1

. Requests shall be made in the form and substance as may be requested by the finance committee chairperson, and shall be forwarded through the house or senate fiscal adviser to the state budget officer, who shall determine the agency or agencies affected by the bill, or for bills affecting cities and towns to the chief executive official of the cities and the towns, the Rhode Island League of Cities and Towns, and the department of revenue. The budget officer shall then be responsible, in cooperation with these agencies, for the preparation of the fiscal note, except that the department of administration, in consultation and cooperation with the Rhode Island League of Cities and Towns, shall be responsible for the preparation of the fiscal note for bills affecting cities and towns.

The chairperson of either the house finance or senate finance committee may also require executive branch agencies to provide performance metrics when legislation affecting an agency’s program or policy has an economic impact.

History of Section.

P.L. 1965, ch. 204, § 1; P.L. 1974, ch. 198, art. 6, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 248, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 291, art. 10, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 181, art. 61, § 8; P.L. 2008, ch. 98, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 145, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 155, § 3; P.L. 2013, ch. 209, § 3.

22-12-4.
Return of fiscal notes.

Fiscal notes shall be returned to the chairperson of the committee having the bill or resolution under consideration and to the person making the request within ten (10) calendar days of when the request was made. All completed fiscal notes received by committee in compliance with this chapter shall be reviewed by the advisor of the committee on finance of the house or senate who shall note his or her approval as to accuracy and reliability of the dollar estimates or append his or her comments or exceptions.

If the budget office fails to return a fiscal note within the timeframes set forth in subsection (a) of this section, the house fiscal advisor or the senate fiscal advisor may request any agency or department of state government which may be affected by the bill or resolution under consideration to provide any information that he or she may deem necessary for the preparation of an interim fiscal note. Any agency or department of which such a request is made shall respond in writing to the fiscal advisor within five (5) business days. The house fiscal advisor or the senate fiscal advisor may prepare an interim fiscal note at any time after expiration of the time frame set forth in subsection (a) of this section.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §

22-12-1

, the house in which the bill or resolution originated may consider the bill or resolution if the fiscal note has not been returned within the timeframe set forth in subsection (a) of this section, provided an interim note has been prepared.

History of Section.

P.L. 1965, ch. 204, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 248, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 291, art. 10, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 287, art. 16, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 126, art. 47, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 70, art. 33, § 1.

22-12-5.
Failure to supply information.

Whenever a bill or resolution, requiring a fiscal note as set forth in §

22-12-2

, affects a city or town financially and the affected city or town fails to supply the necessary financial information or fails to cooperate with the agency or entity, as set forth in §

22-12-3

, compiling the financial information within five (5) business days after the request for the financial information, then the chairperson of the legislative committee to which the bill is assigned shall notify the chief executive official of the city or town, by certified mail, return receipt requested, that the city or town has not supplied or has failed to cooperate in the compiling of the financial information. The affected city or town shall have three (3) calendar days from the receipt of the certified letter to supply the financial information. In the event that the bill or resolution becomes law and has a financial effect on the city or town, which does or could necessitate additional expenditures from local revenue, then the provisions of §§

45-13-6

—

45-13-11

shall not apply.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 291, art. 10, § 2; P.L. 1994, ch. 70, art. 33, § 1.